en: Saxophone Parts
xx: Saxophone Parts
cs: Součásti saxofonu
da: Saxofon – dele
de: Saxophonteile
es: Piezas para saxofón
fr: Parties de saxophone
it: Pezzi per sassofono
ja: サックス用パーツ
nl: Onderdelen voor saxofoon
no: Saksofondeler
pl: Części do saksofonów
pt: Peças para saxofone
ru: Детали для саксофонов
sv: Saxofondelar
tr: Saksafon Parçaları

en: Saxophone Mouthpieces
xx: Saxophone Mouthpieces
cs: Saxofonové hubičky
da: Saxofon – mundstykker
de: Mundstücke für Saxophone
es: Boquillas para saxofón
fr: Becs pour saxophones
it: Bocchini per sassofono
ja: サックス用マウスピース
nl: Mondstukken voor saxofoon
no: Saksofon-munnstykker
pl: Ustniki do saksofonów
pt: Boquilhas para saxofone
ru: Мундштуки для саксофонов
sv: Saxofonmunstycken
tr: Saksafon Bekleri

en: Saxophone Necks
xx: Saxophone Necks
cs: Saxofonové krky
da: Saxofon – halsstykker
de: Saxophonhälse
es: Cuellos para saxofón
fr: Bocaux de saxophones
it: Colli per sassofono
ja: サックス用ネック
nl: Saxofoonnekken
no: Saksofon-halser
pl: Szyjki do saksofonów
pt: Correias de pescoço para saxofone
ru: Шейки для саксофонов
sv: Saxofonnackar
tr: Saksafon Boyunları

en: Saxophone Small Parts
xx: Saxophone Small Parts
cs: Drobné součásti pro saxofon
da: Saxofon – smådele
de: Kleinere Saxophonzubehörteile
es: Piezas pequeñas para saxofón
fr: Petites pièces pour saxophones
it: Piccole parti sassofono
ja: サックス用小型パーツ
nl: Kleine onderdelen voor saxofoon
no: Små saksofondeler
pl: Drobne części do saksofonów
pt: Peças pequenas para saxofone
ru: Мелкие детали для саксофонов
sv: Smådelar för saxofoner
tr: Saksafon Küçük Parçaları

en: Saxophone Pegs & Stands
xx: Saxophone Pegs & Stands
cs: Podpěry a stojany na saxofon
da: Saxofon – stativer
de: Saxophonhalter & -ständer
es: Soportes y clavijas para saxofón
fr: Supports pour saxophones
it: Supporti per sassofono
ja: サックス用ペグ・スタンド
nl: Statieven en standaards voor saxofoon
no: Saksofon-holdere og -stativer
pl: Wieszaki i stojaki na saksofony
pt: Apoios e suportes para saxofone
ru: Подставки и стойки для саксофонов
sv: Saxofonstativ
tr: Saksafon Sehpa ve Stantları

en: Saxophone Reeds
xx: Saxophone Reeds
cs: Saxofonové plátky
da: Saxofon – rørblade
de: Rohrblätter für Saxophone
es: Cañas para saxofón
fr: Anches pour saxophones
it: Ance per sassofono
ja: サックス用リード
nl: Saxofoonrieten
no: Saksofonfliser
pl: Stroiki do saksofonów
pt: Palhetas de saxofone
ru: Трости для саксофонов
sv: Saxofonrörblad
tr: Saksafon Kamışları

en: Saxophone Straps & Supports
xx: Saxophone Straps & Supports
cs: Popruhy pro saxofony
da: Saxofon – remme
de: Saxophonriemen/-stützen
es: Soportes y cordones para saxofón
fr: Cordons et harnais pour saxophones
it: Collarini/supporti sassofono
ja: サックス用ストラップ
nl: Bandjes en steunen voor saxofoon
no: Saksofon-stropper og -støtter
pl: Paski i podpórki do saksofonów
pt: Cordões e suportes para saxofone
ru: Ремни и подставки для саксофонов
sv: Remmar och stöd för saxofoner
tr: Saksafon Askı ve Destekleri

en: Woodwind Cork Grease
xx: Woodwind Cork Grease
cs: Vazelína na korková těsnění
da: Træblæserinstrumenter – korkfedt
de: Korkfett für Holzblasinstrumente
es: Grasa de corcho para instrumentos de viento-madera
fr: Graisse de liège pour instruments à vent
it: Grasso sugheri strumenti a fiato
ja: 木管楽器用コルクグリス
nl: Kurkvet voor houten blaasinstrumenten
no: Korksmøring for treblåsere
pl: Smary do korków instrumentów dętych drewnianych
pt: Graxa de cortiça para instrumentos de sopro de madeira
ru: Смазка для пробки для деревянных духовых инструментов
sv: Korkfett för träblåsinstrument
tr: Nefesli Çalgı Mantar Kremleri

en: Woodwind Polishing Cloths
xx: Woodwind Polishing Cloths
cs: Čisticí utěrky na dřevěné dechové nástroje
da: Træblæserinstrumenter – pudseklude
de: Poliertücher für Holzblasinstrumente
es: Gamuzas para instrumentos de viento-madera
fr: Chiffons de polissage pour instruments à vent
it: Panni lucidatura strumenti a fiato
ja: 木管楽器用ポリッシングクロス
nl: Poetsdoeken voor houtblazers
no: Pussefiller for treblåsere
pl: Ściereczki do polerowania instrumentów dętych drewnianych
pt: Tecidos para polir instrumentos de sopro de madeira
ru: Ткань для полировки деревянных духовых инструментов
sv: Putsdukar till träblåsinstrument
tr: Nefesli Çalgı Parlatma Bezleri

en: Woodwind Reed Cases
xx: Woodwind Reed Cases
cs: Pouzdra na plátky dřevěných dechových nástrojů
da: Træblæserinstrumenter – rørbladekasser
de: Blätteretui für Holzblasinstrumente
es: Guardacañas para instrumentos de viento-madera
fr: Étuis pour anches d'instruments à vent
it: Custodie ance strumenti a fiato
ja: 木管楽器用リードケース
nl: Koffers voor rieten van houten blaasinstrumenten
no: Fliseetuier for treblåsere
pl: Futerały na stroiki do instrumentów drewnianych
pt: Estojos para palhetas de instrumentos de sopro de madeira
ru: Футляры для тростей для деревянных духовых инструментов
sv: Rörbladsfodral för träblåsinstrument
tr: Nefesli Çalgı Kamış Kutuları

en: Woodwind Reed Knives
xx: Woodwind Reed Knives
cs: Nože na plátky dřevěných dechových nástrojů
da: Træblæserinstrumenter – knivblade
de: Fagottblattmesser
es: Navajas para cañas de instrumentos de viento-madera
fr: Couteaux pour anches
it: Coltelli ance strumenti a fiato
ja: 木管楽器用リードナイフ
nl: Mes voor riet van houten blaasinstrumenten
no: Flisekniver for treblåsere
pl: Noże do stroików do instrumentów drewnianych
pt: Instrumentos para afinar instrumentos de sopro de madeira
ru: Ножи для тростей для деревянных духовых инструментов
sv: Rörbladsknivar för träblåsinstrument
tr: Nefesli Çalgı Kamış Bıçakları

en: Musical instruments, Music instruments
xx: Musical Instruments
ar: آلات موسيقية
as: বাদ্যযন্ত্ৰ
az: Musiqi alətləri
be: Музычныя інструменты
bg: Музикални инструменти
bn: বাদ্যযন্ত্র
cs: Hudební nástroje
da: Musikinstrumenter
de: Musikinstrumente
el: Μουσικά όργανα
es: Instrumentos musicales
et: Muusikariistad
fa: آلات موسیقی
fi: Soittimet
fr: Instruments de musique, Instrument de musique
ga: Uirlisí ceoil
gu: સંગીતનાં સાધનો
hi: संगीत वाद्ययंत्र
hr: Glazbeni instrumenti
hu: Hangszerek
hy: Երաժշտական գործիքներ
id: Alat musik
is: Hljóðfæri
it: Strumenti musicali
ja: 楽器
jw: Piranti musik
ka: მუსიკალური ინსტრუმენტები
kk: Музыкалық аспаптар
km: ឧបករណ៍ភ្លេង
kn: ಸಂಗೀತ ವಾದ್ಯಗಳು
ko: 악기
ky: Музыкалык аспаптар
lt: Muzikos instrumentai
lv: Mūzikas instrumenti
mk: Музички инструменти
ml: സംഗീതോപകരണങ്ങൾ
mn: Хөгжмийн зэмсэг
mr: संगीत वाद्ये
ms: Alat muzik
mt: Strumenti mużikali
my: တူရိယာများ
ne: संगीत वाद्ययन्त्रहरू
nl: Muziekinstrumenten
no: Musikkinstrumenter
or: ସଙ୍ଗୀତ ବାଦ୍ୟଯନ୍ତ୍ର
pa: ਸੰਗੀਤਕ ਸਾਜ਼
pl: Instrumenty muzyczne
ps: د موسیقۍ وسایل
pt: Instrumentos musicais
ro: Instrumente muzicale
ru: Музыкальные инструменты
sd: موسيقي جا اوزار
si: සංගීත භාණ්ඩ
sk: Hudobné nástroje
sl: Glasbeni instrumenti
so: Qalabka muusikada
sq: Instrumente muzikore
sr: Музички инструменти
sv: Musikinstrument
sw: Vyombo vya muziki
ta: இசை கருவிகள்
te: సంగీత వాయిద్యాలు
tg: Асбобҳои мусиқӣ
th: เครื่องดนตรี
tk: Saz gurallary
tl: Mga instrumentong pangmusika
tr: Müzik aletleri
uk: Музичні інструменти
ur: موسیقی کے آلات
uz: Musiqa asboblari
vi: Nhạc cụ
xh: Izixhobo zomculo
yo: Awọn ohun èlò orin
zh: 乐器
zu: Izinsimbi zomculo

en: Accordions & Concertinas
xx: Accordions & Concertinas
cs: Akordeony a tahací harmoniky
da: Harmonikar og koncertinaer
de: Akkordeons & Konzertinas
es: Acordeones y concertinas
fr: Accordéons et concertinas
it: Fisarmoniche/fisarmoniche portatili
ja: アコーディオン・コンサーティーナ
nl: Accordeons en concertina's
no: Trekkspill og concertinaer
pl: Akordeony i koncertyny
pt: Acordeões e concertinas
ru: Аккордеоны и концертины
sv: Dragspel och concertinor
tr: Akordeonlar ve Konçertinalar

en: Bagpipes
xx: Bagpipes
cs: Dudy
da: Sækkepiber
de: Dudelsäcke
es: Gaitas
fr: Cornemuses
it: Cornamuse
ja: バグパイプ
nl: Doedelzakken
no: Sekkepiper
pl: Dudy
pt: Gaita de fole
ru: Волынки
sv: Säckpipor
tr: Gaydalar

en: Brass Instruments
xx: Brass Instruments
cs: Dechové nástroje
da: Messingblæsere
de: Blechblasinstrumente
es: Instrumentos de metal
fr: Cuivres, instrument à cuivre
it: Ottoni
ja: 金管楽器
nl: Koperen blaasinstrumenten
no: Messingblåseinstrumenter
pl: Instrumenty dęte blaszane
pt: Instrumentos de sopro de metal
ru: Медные духовые инструменты
sv: Bleckblåsinstrument
tr: Üflemeli Çalgılar

en: Alto & Baritone Horns
xx: Alto & Baritone Horns
cs: Altové a barytonové lesní rohy
da: Althorn og baritoner
de: Alt- & Baritonhörner
es: Trompas alto y barítono
fr: Cors altos et barytons
it: Corni alti e baritoni
ja: アルトホルン・バリトンホルン
nl: Alten en baritons
no: Althorn og baryton
pl: Rogi altowe i barytonowe
pt: Saxofone barítono e contralto
ru: Альтгорны и баритоны
sv: Alt- och barytonhorn
tr: Alto ve Bariton Borular

en: Euphoniums
xx: Euphoniums
cs: Barytonové baskřídlovky
da: Barytonhorn
de: Euphonien
es: Eufonios
fr: Euphoniums
it: Eufoni
ja: ユーフォニウム
nl: Eufoniums
no: Barytonhorn
pl: Eufonia
pt: Eufônios
ru: Баритоны
sv: Eufonier
tr: Küçük Baslar

en: French Horns
xx: French Horns
cs: Lesní rohy
da: Alpehorn
de: Waldhörner
es: Trompas
fr: Cors d'harmonie
it: Corni a pistoni
ja: フレンチホルン
nl: Hoorns
no: Valthorn
pl: Rogi
pt: Trompas
ru: Валторны
sv: Valthorn
tr: Fransız Kornoları

en: Trombones
xx: Trombones
cs: Trombóny
da: Trækbasuner
de: Posaunen
es: Trombones
fr: Trombones
it: Tromboni
ja: トロンボーン
nl: Trombones
no: Tromboner
pl: Puzony
pt: Trombones
ru: Тромбоны
sv: Tromboner
tr: Trombonlar

en: Trumpets & Cornets
xx: Trumpets & Cornets
cs: Trubky a kornety
da: Trompeter og kornetter
de: Trompeten & Kornetts
es: Trompetas y cornetas
fr: Trompettes et cornets
it: Trombe e cornette
ja: トランペット・コルネット
nl: Trompetten en kornetten
no: Trompeter og kornetter
pl: Trąbki i kornety
pt: Trompetas e cornetins
ru: Трубы и корнеты
sv: Trumpeter och kornetter
tr: Trompetler ve Kornetler